Maryland, session 2025, HB1210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1210*

HOUSE BILL 1210
Article – Labor and Employment
9–721.
(c) [If] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, IF a permanent
impairment involves a behavioral or mental disorder, a licensed psychologist, LICENSED
CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORKER–CLINICAL, or qualified physician shall:
(1) perform an evaluation of only the mental or behavioral portion of the
permanent impairment; and
(2) report the evaluation to the Commission in accordance with the
regulations of the Commission.
(D) TO PERFORM AND REPORT AN EVALUATION UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION, A LICENSED CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORKER–CLINICAL SHALL COMPLY
WITH THE REQUIREMENTS FOR EXPERT WITNESSES IN THE REGULATIONS OF THE
COMMISSION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.